Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.080

State honors awards program—Materials—Recognition by business and industry encouraged.

The superintendent of public instruction shall provide participating high schools with the necessary materials for conferring honors. The superintendent of public instruction shall require participating high schools to encourage local representatives of business and industry to recognize students in their communities who receive an honors designation based on the Washington state honors awards program.

[ 1985 c 62 s 4. Formerly RCW 28A.03.446.]